Hawaii statutes.
§431:19-101.8 Captive insurance
administrative fund. (a) The commissioner may establish a separate fund
designated as the captive insurance administrative fund to be expended by the
commissioner to carry out the commissioner's duties and obligations under this
article.

(b) All moneys collected pursuant to this
article, including premium taxes from captive insurance companies licensed in
this State under this article, all captive insurance company application fees,
annual license fees, and examination fees, shall be credited to the captive
insurance administrative fund.

(c) Up to ten per cent of the total moneys
credited to the fund in the prior fiscal year may be used for purposes of
promoting Hawaii as a captive insurance domicile. Disbursements for
promotional activities from the fund shall be subject to the approval of the
director of commerce and consumer affairs.

(d) Sums from the fund expended by the
commissioner shall be used to defray any administrative costs, including
personnel costs associated with the captive programs of the insurance division,
and costs incurred by supporting offices, branches, divisions, and
departments. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the commissioner may use
the moneys in the fund to employ or retain, by contract or otherwise and
without regard to chapter 76, hearings officers, attorneys, investigators,
accountants, examiners, and other necessary professional, technical, and
support personnel to implement and carry out the purposes of this article;
provided that any position, except any attorney position, that is subject to
chapter 76 prior to July 1, 1999, shall remain subject to chapter 76.

(e) Moneys deposited by the commissioner in
the fund shall not revert to the general fund. [L 1997, c 261, pt of §2; am L
1999, c 163, §12; am L 2000, c 131, §1; am L 2002, c 39, §17 and c 206, §1; am
L Sp 2005, c 1, §2; am L 2012, c 253, §5]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next